Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8915
Provisional license conditions.

To enable the establishment of distribution of veterinary legend drugs in this state, the department may issue a provisional license on or before July 1, 2009, to any applicant who meets the following conditions:

(1) The applicant has not been found to have committed any of the acts or offenses described in section 71-8917;

(2) The applicant has established written policies and procedures as required by section 71-8914; and

(3) The applicant has paid a fee of five hundred dollars.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 15.